Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB932.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 161 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The General Assembly hereby finds that:
(a) Respecting the authority of teachers is essential to creating an environment
conducive to learning, effective instruction in the classroom, and proper
administration of the public schools; and
(b) To maintain and protect the authority of teachers, it is important that
teachers, school and district administrators, parents, and students are fully
informed of the various rights conferred upon teachers pursuant to this
section.
(2) Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, a teacher in a local school district
has the right to:
(a) Teach free from the fear of frivolous lawsuits, including the right to
qualified immunity and to a legal defense, and to indemnification by the
employing local school board for actions taken in the performance of duties
of the teacher's employment;
(b) Appropriately discipline students in accordance with KRS 158.150 and local
school board policy;
(c) Establish classroom rules of conduct applicable to students in the
classroom;
(d) Remove any persistently disruptive student from his or her classroom when
the student's behavior prevents the orderly instruction of other students or
when the student displays impudent or defiant behavior and to place the
student in the custody of the principal or his or her designee;
(e) Have his or her professional judgment and discretion respected by school
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2266
and local school district administrators in any disciplinary action taken by
the teacher in accordance with local school district policy;
(f) Teach in a safe, secure, and orderly environment that is conducive to
learning and free from recognized dangers or hazards that cause or are
likely to cause serious injury;
(g) Request and receive information relating to the disposition of any referrals
to a school principal, local school district superintendent, or local school
board for a violation of classroom rules of conduct, school rules or policies,
or local school district policies;
(h) Communicate with and to request the participation of parents in
appropriate student disciplinary decisions;
(i) Report and pursue criminal charges if there is reason to believe that a crime
has been committed on local school district property, during school-
sponsored transportation, or during school-sponsored activities;
(j) Use reasonable force, according to policies adopted by the Kentucky Board
of Education, to protect himself or herself or others from injury;
(k) Complete only paperwork that is not excessively burdensome and that, if
required by statute or administrative regulation, adheres to the statute or
administrative regulation and does not result in overly cumbersome
interpretations of that statute or administrative regulation;
(l) Receive leadership and support as a beginning teacher, including the
assignment of a qualified, experienced mentor who commits to helping the
beginning teacher become a competent, confident professional in the
classroom and offers support and assistance as needed to meet performance
standards and professional expectations;
(m) Request and receive training and other assistance to improve his or her
skills in classroom management, violence prevention, conflict resolution,
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2266
and related areas;
(n) A coordinated system of professional development with the goals of
increasing student achievement, enhancing classroom instruction, and
preparing students for continuing their education or joining the workforce;
(o) Be afforded time during the school day or week to collaborate with other
teachers;
(p) Direct his or her classroom instruction;
(q) Receive student assessment data in a timely manner in order to assist in
improving classroom instruction;
(r) Not have their right to work be denied or abridged on account of
membership or nonmembership in any labor union;
(s) Be free from discrimination in the public schools; and
(t) Be treated with civility and respect.
(3) A local school board shall not establish policies that prevent teachers from
exercising the rights provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) This section shall not be construed to prevent a local school board from providing
a teacher in a local school district additional rights it deems important to
fulfilling the duties of the teacher.
(5) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, each local school board shall:
(a) Provide a copy of the rights established in subsection (2) of this section to
all teachers at the beginning of each school year; and
(b) Require each public school building that contains instructional space for
students enrolled in the local school district and any administrative building
to conspicuously display in a prominent location a printed abstract of the
rights established in subsection (2) of this section. The same information or
display shall also be posted on the district or school website.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 3/3/2026 7:19 PM Jacketed